Nebraska, session 109, LB488.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-2266.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
29-2266.01 (1) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to
believe that a probationer sentenced for a misdemeanor has committed or
is about to commit a violation of a condition of probation, the probation
officer shall either:
(a) Impose one or more administrative sanctions with the approval of
his or her chief probation officer or such chief's designee. The decision
to impose an administrative sanction in lieu of formal revocation
proceedings rests with the probation officer and his or her chief
probation officer or such chief's designee and shall be based upon the
probationer's risk level, the severity of the violation, and the
probationer's response to the violation. If an administrative sanction is
to be imposed, the probationer shall acknowledge in writing the nature of
the violation and agree upon the administrative sanction. The probationer
has the right to decline to acknowledge the violation; and if he or she
declines to acknowledge the violation, the probation officer shall take
action pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section. The probation
officer shall submit a written report to the county attorney of the
county where probation was imposed, outlining the nature of the probation
violation and the sanction imposed; or
(b) Submit a written report to the sentencing court, with a copy to
the county attorney of the county where probation was imposed, outlining
the nature of the probation violation and request that formal revocation
proceedings be initiated against the probationer in accordance with
sections 29-2267 and 29-2268.
(2) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a probationer sentenced for a misdemeanor has violated or is about
to violate a condition of his or her probation and that the probationer
will attempt to leave the jurisdiction or will place lives or property in
danger, the probation officer shall arrest the probationer without a
-2-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
warrant and may call on any peace officer for assistance. If called on by
a probation officer, a peace officer shall arrest and assume custody of
the probationer. Whenever a probationer is arrested, with or without a
warrant, he or she shall be detained in a jail or other detention
facility.
(3) Immediately after arrest and detention pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section, the probation officer shall notify the county
attorney of the county where probation was imposed and submit a written
report of the reason for such arrest and of any violation of probation.
After prompt consideration of such written report, the county attorney
shall:
(a) Notify the probation officer and the jail or detention facility,
in writing, that he or she does not intend to file a motion to revoke
probation, and authorize the release of the probationer from confinement;
or
(b) File with the sentencing court a motion or information to revoke
probation in accordance with sections 29-2267 and 29-2268.
(4) Whenever a county attorney receives a report from a probation
officer that a probationer sentenced for a misdemeanor has violated a
condition of probation, the county attorney may file a motion or
information to revoke probation in accordance with sections 29-2267 and
29-2268.
(5) The administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 2. Section 29-2266.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2266.02 (1) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to
believe that a probationer sentenced for a felony has committed or is
about to commit a violation while on probation, the probation officer
shall consider:
(a) Whether the probation officer is required to arrest the
-3-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
probationer pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The probationer's risk level, the severity of the violation, and
the probationer's response to the violation;
(c) Whether to impose administrative sanctions or seek custodial
sanctions; or
(d) Whether to seek revocation of probation.
(2) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a probationer sentenced for a felony has violated or is about to
violate a condition of his or her probation and that the probationer will
attempt to leave the jurisdiction or will place lives or property in
danger, the probation officer shall arrest the probationer without a
warrant and may call on any peace officer for assistance. If called on by
a probation officer, a peace officer shall arrest and assume custody of
the probationer. Whenever a probationer is arrested, with or without a
warrant, he or she shall be detained in a jail or other detention
facility.
(3) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a probationer sentenced for a felony has committed or is about to
commit a violation of a condition of probation, the probation officer
shall:
(a) Impose one or more administrative sanctions with the approval of
his or her chief probation officer or such chief's designee. The decision
to impose an administrative sanction rests with the probation officer and
his or her chief probation officer or such chief's designee and shall be
based upon the probationer's risk level, the severity of the violation,
and the probationer's response to the violation. If an administrative
sanction is to be imposed, the probationer shall acknowledge in writing
the nature of the violation and agree upon the administrative sanction.
The probationer has the right to decline to acknowledge the violation;
and if he or she declines to acknowledge the violation, the probation
officer shall take action pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of this
-4-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
section. The probation officer shall submit a written report to the
county attorney of the county where probation was imposed, outlining the
nature of the probation violation and the sanction imposed;
(b) Seek the imposition of a custodial sanction with the approval of
his or her chief probation officer or such chief's designee. The decision
to impose a custodial sanction rests with the court and shall be based
upon the probationer's risk level, the severity of the violation, and the
probationer's response to the violation. If a custodial sanction is to be
imposed, the probationer shall acknowledge in writing the nature of the
violation and agree upon the custodial sanction. The probationer has the
right to decline to acknowledge the violation; and if he or she declines
to acknowledge the violation, the probation officer shall take action in
accordance with section 29-2266.03. If the probationer acknowledges the
violation and agrees upon the custodial sanction, the probation officer
shall take action in accordance with subsection (1) of section 29-2266.03
and shall submit a written report to the county attorney of the county
where probation was imposed, outlining the nature of the probation
violation and the sanction to be imposed; or
(c) Submit a written report to the sentencing court, with a copy to
the county attorney of the county where probation was imposed, outlining
the nature of the probation violation and request that formal revocation
proceedings be initiated against the probationer in accordance with
sections 29-2267 and 29-2268.
(4) Immediately after arrest and detention pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section, the probation officer shall notify the county
attorney of the county where probation was imposed and submit a written
report of the reason for such arrest and of any violation of probation.
After prompt consideration of such written report, the county attorney
shall:
(a) Notify the probation officer and the jail or detention facility,
in writing, that he or she does not intend to file a motion to revoke
-5-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
probation, and authorize the release of the probationer from confinement;
or
(b) File with the sentencing court a motion or information to revoke
probation in accordance with sections 29-2267 and 29-2268.
(5) Whenever a county attorney receives a report from a probation
officer that a probationer sentenced for a felony has violated a
condition of probation, the county attorney may file a motion or
information to revoke probation in accordance with sections 29-2267 and
29-2268.
(6) The administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section, including, but not limited to,
rules and regulations to ensure prompt court review of requests for the
imposition of custodial sanctions.
Sec. 3. Section 43-248, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-248 A peace officer shall take a juvenile into temporary custody
upon the request for assistance from a probation officer as provided in
subsection (6) of section 43-286.01. A peace officer may take a juvenile
into temporary custody without a warrant or order of the court and
proceed as provided in section 43-250 when:
(1) A juvenile has violated a state law or municipal ordinance and
such juvenile was eleven years of age or older at the time of the
violation, and the officer has reasonable grounds to believe such
juvenile committed such violation and was eleven years of age or older at
the time of the violation;
(2) The officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the juvenile
has run away from his or her parent, guardian, or custodian;
(3) A probation officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
juvenile is in violation of probation and that the juvenile will attempt
to leave the jurisdiction or place lives or property in danger;
(4) The officer has reasonable grounds to believe the juvenile is
-6-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
truant from school;
(5) The officer has reasonable grounds to believe the juvenile is
immune from prosecution for prostitution under subsection (5) of section
28-801;
(6) A juvenile is seriously endangered in his or her surroundings
and immediate removal appears to be necessary for the juvenile's
protection;
(7) A juvenile has committed an act or engaged in behavior described
in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 and such
juvenile was under eleven years of age at the time of such act or
behavior, and the officer has reasonable cause to believe such juvenile
committed such act or engaged in such behavior and was under eleven years
of age at such time; or
(8) The officer believes the juvenile to be mentally ill and
dangerous as defined in section 71-908 and that the harm described in
that section is likely to occur before proceedings may be instituted
before the juvenile court.
Sec. 4. Section 43-286.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-286.01 (1) For purposes of this section, graduated response means
an accountability-based series of sanctions, incentives, and services
designed to facilitate the juvenile’s continued progress in changing
behavior, ongoing compliance, and successful completion of probation.
Graduated response does not include restrictions of liberty that would
otherwise require a hearing under subsection (3) of section 43-253.
(2) The Office of Probation Administration may establish a statewide
standardized graduated response matrix of incentives for compliance and
positive behaviors and sanctions for probationers who violate the terms
and conditions of a court order. The graduated response system shall use
recognized best practices and be developed with the input of
stakeholders, including judges, probation officers, county attorneys,
-7-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
defense attorneys, juveniles, and parents. The office shall provide
implementation and ongoing training to all probation officers on the
graduated response options.
(3) Graduated response sanctions should be immediate, certain,
consistent, and fair to appropriately address the behavior. Failure to
complete a sanction may result in repeating the sanction, increasing the
duration, or selecting a different sanction similar in nature. Continued
failure to comply could result in a request for a motion to revoke
probation. Once a sanction is successfully completed the alleged
probation violation is deemed resolved and cannot be alleged as a
violation in future proceedings.
(4) Graduated response incentives should provide positive
reinforcement to encourage and support positive behavior change and
compliance with court-ordered conditions of probation.
(5) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a juvenile subject to the supervision of a probation officer has
committed a violation of the terms of the juvenile's probation while on
probation, but that such juvenile will not attempt to leave the
jurisdiction and will not place lives or property in danger, the
probation officer shall either:
(a) Impose one or more graduated response sanctions with the
approval of his or her chief probation officer or such chief's designee.
The decision to impose graduated response sanctions in lieu of formal
revocation proceedings rests with the probation officer and his or her
chief probation officer or such chief's designee and shall be based upon
such juvenile's risk level, the severity of the violation, and the
juvenile's response to the violation. If graduated response sanctions are
to be imposed, such juvenile shall acknowledge in writing the nature of
the violation and agree upon the graduated response sanction with
approval of such juvenile's parents or guardian. Such juvenile has the
right to decline to acknowledge the violation, and if he or she declines
-8-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
to acknowledge the violation, the probation officer shall submit a
written report pursuant to subdivision (5)(b) of this section. If the
juvenile fails to satisfy the graduated response sanctions and the office
determines that a motion to revoke probation should be pursued, the
probation officer shall submit a written report pursuant to subdivision
(5)(b) of this section. A copy of the report shall be submitted to the
county attorney of the county where probation was imposed; or
(b) Submit a written report to the county attorney of the county
where probation was imposed and to the juvenile’s attorney of record,
outlining the nature of the probation violation and request that formal
revocation proceedings be instituted against the juvenile subject to the
supervision of a probation officer. The report shall also include a
statement regarding why graduated response sanctions were not utilized or
were ineffective. If there is no attorney of record for the juvenile, the
office shall notify the court and counsel for the juvenile shall be
appointed.
(6) Whenever a probation officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a juvenile subject to the supervision of a probation officer has
violated a condition of his or her probation and that such juvenile will
attempt to leave the jurisdiction or will place lives or property in
danger, the probation officer shall take such juvenile into temporary
custody without a warrant and may call on any peace officer for
assistance as provided in section 43-248. If called on by a probation
officer, a peace officer shall take the juvenile into temporary custody.
Continued detention or deprivation of liberty shall be subject to the
criteria and requirements of sections 43-251.01, 43-260, and 43-260.01
and subdivision (5)(b)(iv) of section 43-286, and a hearing shall be held
before the court within twenty-four hours as provided in subsection (3)
of section 43-253.
(7) Immediately after detention or deprivation of liberty pursuant
to subsection (6) of this section, the probation officer shall notify the
-9-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
county attorney of the county where probation was imposed and the
juvenile's attorney of record and submit a written report describing the
risk of harm to lives or property or of fleeing the jurisdiction which
precipitated the need for such detention or deprivation of liberty and of
any violation of probation. If there is no attorney of record for the
juvenile, the office shall notify the court and counsel for the juvenile
shall be appointed. After prompt consideration of the written report, the
county attorney shall:
(a) Order the release of the juvenile from confinement or
alternative to detention subject to the supervision of a probation
officer; or
(b) File with the adjudicating court a motion to revoke the
probation.
(8) Whenever a county attorney receives a report from a probation
officer that a juvenile subject to the supervision of a probation officer
has violated a condition of probation and the probation officer is
seeking revocation of probation, the county attorney may file a motion to
revoke probation.
(9) Whenever a juvenile subject to supervision of a probation
officer is engaging in positive behavior, completion of goals, and
compliance with the terms of probation, the probation officer shall use
graduated incentives to provide positive reinforcement and encouragement
of such behavior. The office shall keep records of all incentives and
provide such records to the county attorney or the juvenile’s attorney
upon request.
(10) During the term of probation, the court, on application of a
probation officer or of the juvenile or on its own motion, may reduce or
eliminate any of the conditions imposed on the juvenile. Upon completion
of the term of probation or the earlier discharge of the juvenile, the
juvenile shall be relieved of any obligations imposed by the order of the
court and his or her record shall be sealed pursuant to section
-10-

LB488 LB488
2025 2025
43-2,108.04.
(11) The probation administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 5. Original sections 29-2266.01 and 29-2266.02, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 43-248 and 43-286.01, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-11-